Arkansas, session 2025, HB1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Office of Attorney General for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q426U CHIEF DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL 1 $200,000
(2) Q242U SOLICITOR GENERAL 1 $200,000
(3) Q427U DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL 12 $184,000
(4) Q428U SENIOR ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL I 4 $161,000
(5) Q446U SENIOR MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT I 4 $155,000
(6) Q434U SENIOR ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL II 12 $154,000
*JAR036*
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
(7) Q448U SENIOR MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT II 5 $138,000
(8) Q447U SENIOR ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL III 17 $138,000
(9) Q430U ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL I 13 $124,000
(10) Q431U ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL II 22 $111,000
(11) Q432U MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT 7 $99,000
(12) Q074U INVESTIGATOR I 4 $99,000
(13) Q433U SENIOR ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 12 $85,000
(14) Q070U INVESTIGATOR II 6 $85,000
(15) Q130U INVESTIGATOR III 10 $71,000
(16) Q034U ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT I 18 $71,000
(17) Q071U ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT II 16 $64,000
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 164

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Office of Attorney General - Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known
as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
ten (10) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not
to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act,
or its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Office of Attorney General, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Office of
Attorney General for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $18,533,205
(02) EXTRA HELP 250,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,624,505
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,885,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 25,000
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $26,392,710

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - MEDICAID FRAUD DIVISION - STATE. There
is hereby established for the Office of Attorney General - Medicaid Fraud
Division - State for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q427U DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL 1 $184,000
(2) Q448U SENIOR MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT II 1 $138,000
(3) Q430U ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL I 2 $124,000
(4) Q432U MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT 1 $99,000
(5) Q071U ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT II 1 $64,000
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAID FRAUD DIVISION - STATE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of Attorney General, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Office of Attorney General - Medicaid Fraud Division - State for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $738,800
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 219,547
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 56,235
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 27,100
(C) PROF. FEES 17,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 10,500
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,069,182
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146

SECTION 6. REGULAR SALARIES - MEDICAID FRAUD DIVISION - FEDERAL. There
is hereby established for the Office of Attorney General - Medicaid Fraud
Division - Federal for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q428U SENIOR ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL I 2 $161,000
(2) Q448U SENIOR MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT II 1 $138,000
(3) Q447U SENIOR ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL III 1 $138,000
(4) Q430U ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL I 2 $124,000
(5) Q431U ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL II 1 $111,000
(6) Q432U MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT 1 $99,000
(7) Q074U INVESTIGATOR I 2 $99,000
(8) Q433U SENIOR ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 3 $85,000
(9) Q070U INVESTIGATOR II 5 $85,000
(10) Q071U ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT II 1 $64,000
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 19

SECTION 7. EXTRA HELP - MEDICAID FRAUD DIVISION - FEDERAL. There is
hereby authorized, for the Office of Attorney General - Medicaid Fraud
Division - Federal for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAID FRAUD DIVISION - FEDERAL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of Attorney General, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Office of Attorney General -
Medicaid Fraud Division - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,009,600
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 614,785
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 321,275
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 81,300
(C) PROF. FEES 418,469
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 31,500
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,506,929

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAID FRAUD DIVISION - INDIRECT COSTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of Attorney General, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses of the Office of Attorney General -
Medicaid Fraud Division - Indirect Costs for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $498,461
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $498,461

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of Attorney General, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Office of Attorney General - Internet Crimes
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
Against Children for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000

SECTION 11. REGULAR SALARIES - COOPERATIVE DISABILITY INVESTIGATION
PROGRAM. There is hereby established for the Office of Attorney General -
Cooperative Disability Investigation Program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q074U INVESTIGATOR I 2 $99,000
(2) Q433U SENIOR ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 1 $85,000
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - COOPERATIVE DISABILITY INVESTIGATION
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of Attorney General, to
be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Office of
Attorney General - Cooperative Disability Investigation Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $285,600
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 99,125
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
(03) OVERTIME 42,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 55,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $486,725

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - UNRESTRICTED SETTLEMENT FEES
AND OTHER CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of
Attorney General, to be payable from the cash funds as defined by Arkansas
Code 19-4-801, for personal services, miscellaneous operating expenses,
grants, court order payments, consumer education and enforcement activities
from unrestricted settlement fees and other cash funds of the Office of
Attorney General for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum
of...............................................................$10,000,000.

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - SETTLEMENT FEES AND RESTITUTION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Office of Attorney General, to be payable from
the cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services,
miscellaneous operating expenses, grants, fund transfers, and restitution
payments and expenses of the Office of Attorney General for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the sum of.....................................$31,000.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, the Office of Attorney General is authorized to transfer
appropriation from any line item authorized in the Operations Appropriation
of the Office of Attorney General in this Act to any other line item
authorized in the Operations Appropriation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FUND TRANSFER. Immediately upon the effective date of this act, the Attorney
General may deposit or transfer by check monies from the unobligated cash
funds of the Office of Attorney General received from court orders or
settlement agreements to the State Central Services Fund.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 18. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 19. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036

HB1146
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

































01/15/2025 1:29:34 PM JAR036